California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 622, Sec. 3.   (SB 633)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

70037.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University and the Regents of the University of California shall adopt regulations providing for the withholding of institutional services from a student or former student who has been notified in writing at the student’s or former student’s last known address that he or she is in default on a loan or loans under the DREAM Program.

(b) The regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide that the services withheld may be provided during a period when the facts are in dispute or when the student or former student demonstrates to either the Trustees of the California State University or the Regents of the University of California, as applicable, that reasonable progress has been made to repay the loan or that there
 exists a reasonable justification for the delay as determined by the institution. The regulations shall specify the services to be withheld from the student, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) The provision of grades.

(2) The provision of transcripts.

(3) The provision of diplomas.

(c) “Default,” for purposes of this section, means the failure of a borrower to make an installment payment when due, or to meet other terms of the promissory note if the institution holding the loan finds it reasonable to conclude that the borrower no longer intends to honor the obligation to repay, provided that this failure persists for 180 days for a loan repayable in monthly installments, or 240 days for a loan repayable in less frequent
 installments.

(d) This section does not impose any requirement upon the University of California unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, makes this section applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 71.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

70038.

(a) Each participating institution is entitled to an administrative cost allowance for an award year if the institution elects to advance funds under the DREAM Program to students for that award year.

(b) The amount of the administrative cost allowance described in subdivision (a) shall equal 5 percent of the institution’s total amount of DREAM loan funds awarded to students for the award year that the participating institution advances funds to students under the DREAM Program.

(c) Each participating institution may charge its administrative cost allowance to its DREAM revolving fund.

(d) Each participating institution shall use its administrative cost allowance to offset the cost of administering the DREAM Program.

(e) Each participating institution is responsible for administrative costs that exceed its administrative cost allowance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 754, Sec. 3.   (SB 1210)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

70039.

If a state court finds that Section 70033, or any similar provision adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is unlawful, the court may order, as equitable relief, that the participating institution subject to the lawsuit terminate all loans awarded pursuant to that statute or provision deemed unlawful by a state court, but no money damages, loans, or other retroactive relief, may be awarded. In an action in which a state court finds that Section 70033 or any similar provision adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is unlawful, the California State University and the University of California shall be immune from the imposition of any award of money damages, loans, or other retroactive
 relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 754, Sec. 3.   (SB 1210)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24. California Ban on Scholarship Displacement Act of 2021 [70045. - 70048.]

70045.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Ban on Scholarship Displacement Act of 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 925, Sec. 1.   (AB 288)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

70046.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) As of 2020, California students who have financial need and receive private scholarships are unable to make full use of the awards provided to them by private scholarship providers because institutions of higher education reduce their gift aid, grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and fellowship stipends that those students would otherwise be qualified to receive. The reduction of an institution’s financial aid due to private scholarships is referred
 to as “scholarship displacement.”

(b) This act is intended to ensure that private scholarships supplement, and do not supplant, gift aid, grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and fellowship stipends provided by institutions of higher education to California students who have financial need.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 925, Sec. 1.   (AB 288)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

70047.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) An “academic year” is July 1 to June 30, inclusive. The start date of a session shall determine the academic year in which it is included.

(b) “Cost of attendance” means the student’s tuition and fees, books and supplies, living expenses, transportation expenses, and any other student expenses used to calculate a student’s financial need for purposes of student aid programs under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(c) “Expected family contribution” means a student’s expected family contribution
 calculated according to the federal methodology pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69506 as established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(d) (1) “Financial need” means, as used in subdivision (a) of Section 70048, the cost of attendance minus the expected family contribution.

(2) “Financial need” means, as used in subdivision (b) of Section 70048, the cost of attendance minus the student aid index.

(e) “Gift aid” means all financial aid designated for the student’s educational expenses, including a grant, scholarship, tuition waiver, fellowship stipend, or other third-party payment, that is not a loan or pursuant to a work-study program.

(f) “Institutional gift
 aid” means gift aid that is paid for by the institution of higher education from its funds and the recipient of the aid is selected by the institution.

(g) “Institution of higher education” or “institution” means any public or private postsecondary educational institution in the state that receives, or benefits from, state-funded financial assistance or enrolls students who receive state-funded student financial assistance.

(h) “Private scholarship” means financial assistance awarded to students based on one or more factors, including, but not limited to, academic merit, talent, or a particular area of study, by a private company, foundation, or nonprofit organization, or a public charity or service group. A federal, state, or institutional scholarship, including, but not limited to, financial aid
 provided by the Middle Class Scholarship Program established by Article 22 (commencing with Section 70020), shall not be considered a private scholarship.

(i) “Scholarship displacement” means the reduction of institutional gift aid due to private scholarship awards.

(j) “Student” means any California resident that enrolls in any institution of higher education to obtain an undergraduate degree.

(k) “Student Aid Index” means, with respect to a student, an index that reflects an evaluation of a student’s approximate financial resources to contribute toward the student’s postsecondary education expenses for the academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 851, Sec. 1.   (AB 3240)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

70048.

(a) An institution of higher education shall not reduce the institutional gift aid offer of a student who is eligible to receive a federal Pell Grant award, a Cal Grant award, or financial assistance under the California Dream Act for an academic year as a result of private scholarship awards designated for the student unless the student’s gift aid exceeds the student’s annual cost of attendance.

(b) The institution may reduce the institutional gift aid offer of a student who is eligible to receive a federal Pell Grant award, a Cal Grant award, or financial assistance under the California Dream Act by no more than the amount of the student’s gift aid that is in excess
 of the student’s annual cost of attendance.

(c) The institution shall not consider receipt or anticipated receipt of private scholarships when considering a student who is eligible to receive a federal Pell Grant award, a Cal Grant award, or financial assistance under the California Dream Act for qualification for institutional gift aid.

(d) To ensure financial aid is maximized, an institution is encouraged to implement efforts to avoid scholarship displacement through consultation with scholarship providers and students to avoid situations where institutional gift aid and private scholarships can only be used for specific purposes.

(e) This article shall not be interpreted or implemented in a manner inconsistent with
 state or federal law. The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid due to a conflict with federal requirements, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 851, Sec. 3.   (AB 3240)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Nursing Assumption Program of Loans for Education (SNAPLE) [70100. - 70110.]



  ARTICLE 1. Nursing Faculty [70100. - 70110.]

70100.

(a) The Legislature hereby recognizes the growing need for new faculty members in the nursing field at California’s colleges and universities. This need will be fueled largely by the large number of current faculty approaching retirement age who will need to be replaced and the expected growth in enrollment demand in California. Further, to increase the supply of nurses in California, there must be an expansion of nursing educator opportunities in public colleges and universities that will produce the necessary faculty to teach in nursing programs in the state.

(b) The Legislature finds that the rising costs of higher education, coupled with a shift in available financial aid from scholarships and grants to loans, make loan repayment options an important consideration in a student’s decision to pursue a graduate degree in nursing education or in a field related to nursing.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Nursing Assumption Program of Loans for Education (SNAPLE) be designed to encourage persons to complete their graduate educations and serve as nursing faculty in a registered nursing program at an accredited California college or university.

(d) As used in this article, “commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 69616 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 837, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

70101.

(a) Program participants shall meet all of the following eligibility criteria prior to selection into the program, and shall continue to meet these criteria, as appropriate, during the payment periods:

(1) The participant shall be a United States citizen or eligible noncitizen.

(2) The participant shall be a California resident who, at a minimum, possesses a baccalaureate degree in nursing or a field related to nursing.

(3) The participant shall have complied with United States Selective Service requirements.

(4) The participant shall
 not owe a refund on any state or federal educational grant or have delinquent or defaulted student loans.

(b) (1) Any person who has obtained a baccalaureate or graduate degree from an institution of postsecondary education, and who is participating in the loan assumption program set forth in this article, may be eligible to receive a conditional loan assumption agreement, to be redeemed pursuant to this chapter upon meeting the criteria of Section 70102.

(2) A person who is currently teaching nursing at a regionally accredited California college or university is not eligible to enter into an agreement for loan assumption under this article.

(c) (1) The commission shall award loan assumption agreements to either of the following applicants who otherwise meet the eligibility
 criteria of this section:

(A) An applicant who has been admitted to or enrolled in an academic program leading to a graduate level degree and demonstrates academic ability.

(B) An applicant with a baccalaureate, or baccalaureate and graduate degrees.

(2) (A) An applicant who is pursuing a graduate degree shall be enrolled on at least a half-time basis each academic term as defined by an eligible institution and shall agree to maintain satisfactory academic progress.

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), if a program participant fails to maintain half-time enrollment as required by this article, under the terms of the agreement pursuant to subparagraph (A), the loan assumption agreement shall be deemed invalid. The participant
 shall retain full liability for all student loan obligations. The participant is excused from the half-time enrollment requirement if the student is in his or her final term in school and has no additional coursework required to obtain his or her graduate degree in nursing or a field related to nursing.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), a program participant shall be excused from the half-time enrollment requirement for a period not to exceed one calendar year, unless approved by the commission for a longer period, if a program participant becomes unable to maintain half-time enrollment due to any of the following:

(i) Serious illness, pregnancy, or other natural causes.

(ii) The participant is called to military active duty status.

(iii) A natural
 disaster prevents the participant from maintaining half-time enrollment due to the interruption of instruction at the eligible institution.

(3) The applicant shall have been judged by his or her postsecondary institution or employer, whichever is applicable, to have outstanding ability on the basis of criteria that may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(A) Grade point average.

(B) Test scores.

(C) Faculty evaluations.

(D) Interviews.

(E) Other recommendations.

(4) The applicant shall have received, or be approved to receive, a loan under
 one or more of the following designated loan programs:

(A) The Federal Family Education Loan Program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1071 et seq.).

(B) The Federal Direct Loan Program.

(C) Any loan program approved by the commission.

(5) (A) The applicant shall have agreed to teach nursing on a full-time basis at one or more regionally accredited California colleges or universities for at least three years, or on a part-time basis for the equivalent of three full-time academic years, commencing not more than 12 months after obtaining an academic degree, unless the applicant, within 12 months after obtaining the academic degree, enrolls in an academic degree program leading to a more advanced degree in nursing or a field related to nursing.

(B) A participant who possesses a baccalaureate or graduate degree at the time of application to the program shall agree to teach nursing on a full-time or part-time basis commencing not more than 12 months after receiving a loan assumption award.

(6) An applicant who teaches on less than a full-time basis may participate in the program, but is not eligible for loan repayment until that person teaches for the equivalent of a full-time academic year.

(d) A person participating in the program pursuant to this section shall not receive more than one loan assumption agreement, and shall not be eligible to receive a grant pursuant to Article 3.51 (commencing with Section 78260) of Chapter 2 of Part 48.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 187, Sec. 5.   (SB 511)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

70102.

The commission shall commence loan assumption payments pursuant to this article upon verification that the participant has fulfilled all of the following:

(a) The participant has received a baccalaureate degree or a graduate degree from an accredited, participating institution.

(b) The participant has provided the equivalent of full-time nursing instruction at one or more regionally accredited California colleges or universities for one academic year or the equivalent.

(c) The participant has met the requirements of the loan assumption agreement and all other conditions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 183, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

70103.

The terms of the loan assumptions granted under this article shall be as follows, subject to the specific terms of each loan assumption agreement:

(a) After a program participant has completed one academic year, or the equivalent, of full-time teaching nursing studies at one or more regionally accredited, eligible California colleges or universities, pursuant to Section 70102, the commission shall assume up to eight thousand three hundred thirty-three dollars ($8,333) of the outstanding liability of the participant under one or more of the designated loan programs.

(b) After the program participant has completed two consecutive academic years, or the equivalent, of full-time teaching at one or more regionally accredited California colleges or universities, pursuant to Section 70102, the commission shall assume up to an additional eight thousand three hundred thirty-three dollars ($8,333) of the outstanding liability of the participant under one or more of the designated loan programs, for a total loan assumption of up to sixteen thousand six hundred sixty-six dollars ($16,666).

(c) After a program participant has completed three consecutive academic years, or the equivalent of full-time teaching, at one or more regionally accredited California colleges or universities, pursuant to Section 70102, the commission shall assume up to an additional eight thousand three hundred thirty-four dollars ($8,334) of the outstanding liability of the participant under one or more of the designated loan programs, for a total loan assumption of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(d) The commission may assume liability for loans received by the program participant to pay for the costs of obtaining the program participant’s undergraduate and graduate degrees.

(e) The term of the loan assumption agreement shall be not more than 10 years from the date on which the agreement was executed by the program participant and the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 183, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

70104.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if a program participant fails to complete a minimum of three academic years of teaching on a full-time basis or the equivalent on a part-time basis, as required by this article under the terms of the agreement pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 70101, the loan assumption agreement is no longer effective and shall be deemed terminated, and the commission shall not make any further payments. The participant shall retain responsibility for any remaining loan obligations, but shall not be required to repay any loan payments previously made through this program.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a program participant becomes unable to complete one of
 the three years of teaching service on a full-time basis, or the equivalent on a part-time basis, due to a serious illness, pregnancy, or other natural causes, or due to being called to military active duty status, the term of the loan assumption agreement shall be extended for a period not to exceed one academic year, unless extended by the commission on a case-by-case basis. The commission shall make no further payments under the loan assumption agreement until the applicable teaching requirements specified in Section 70103 have been satisfied.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a natural disaster prevents a program participant from completing one of the required years of teaching service due to the interruption of instruction at the employing regionally accredited California college or university, the term of the loan assumption agreement shall be extended for the period of time equal to the period from the interruption of instruction
 at the employing regionally accredited California college or university to the resumption of instruction. The commission shall make no further payments under the loan assumption agreement until the applicable teaching requirements specified in Section 70103 have been satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 511)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

70105.

(a) The commission shall accept nominations from accredited colleges and universities made pursuant to this article.

(b) The commission shall choose from among those nominations of graduate students and applicants who have completed their baccalaureate or graduate degrees with outstanding student loans, based upon criteria that may include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) Grades at the undergraduate level in a subject field related to nursing.

(2) Grades in the undergraduate program.

(3) Aptitude for graduate work in the field of nursing.

(4) General aptitude for graduate study.

(5) Critical human resource needs.

(c) The commission may develop additional criteria for the selection of award recipients consistent with the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

70106.

(a) The commission shall administer this article, and shall adopt rules and regulations for that purpose. The rules and regulations shall include, but need not be limited to, provisions regarding the period of time for which a loan assumption agreement shall remain valid and the development of projections for funding purposes. In developing these rules and regulations, the commission shall solicit the advice of representatives from postsecondary education institutions, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, and the nursing community.

(b) If this article is amended and the commission deems it necessary to adopt a rule or regulation to implement that amendment, the commission shall develop and adopt that rule or regulation no later than 12 months after the operative date of the statute that amends the article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 183, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

70107.

The commission shall work to develop a streamlined application process for participation in the program set forth in this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 69616.7 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 837, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

70109.

Notwithstanding any other law, in any fiscal year, the commission shall award no more than the number of warrants that are authorized by the Governor and the Legislature in the annual Budget Act for that year for the assumption of loans pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 69616.9 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 837, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

70110.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, commencing with the 2006–07 fiscal year, funding necessary for the administration of the student loan assumption program implemented pursuant to this article shall be included within the annual budget of the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 69617 by Stats. 2006, Ch. 837, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Child Savings Account Grant Program [70115. - 70115.2.]

70115.

(a) There is hereby established the Child Savings Account Grant Program under the administration of the commission.

(b) The commission shall implement and administer the Child Savings Account Grant Program to support local governments and nonprofit organizations that sponsor or collaborate on one or more comprehensive citywide or regional child savings account programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 18.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

70115.1.

(a) Subject to an appropriation in the Budget Act, the commission shall distribute grants to qualifying entities based on how many of them are eligible to receive a grant pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, the amount of available funding under the Child Savings Account Grant Program to award grants, the number of students that each participating entity intends to serve under the program, and the percentage of low-income families residing in the community served by each participating entity. The amount of each grant award to a participating entity shall be, at a minimum, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 2019 for this purpose shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the commission until June 30, 2022.

(b) (1) The commission shall award a grant to a qualifying entity for one of the following purposes:

(A) For funding to initiate a new local child savings account program.

(B) For funding to expand an existing local child savings account program.

(2) Up to 74 percent of any appropriation to support the Child Savings Account Grant Program shall be expended pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(3) A minimum of 24 percent of any appropriation to support the Child Savings Account Grant Program shall be expended pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(4) Two percent of any appropriation to
 support the Child Savings Account Grant Program shall be used by the commission for outreach and administration of the program, to establish the Child Savings Account Grant Program Council pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 70115.2, and to provide technical assistance to applicants pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 70115.2.

(c) (1) A qualifying entity seeking a grant pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall meet all of the following requirements to receive the grant:

(A) Not have a local child savings account program in operation or under development.

(B) Seek the grant to establish a local child savings account program that primarily targets children who are 0 to 10 years of age, inclusive.

(C) Have or develop a plan to augment funding it receives under this chapter to provide continued financial support for its proposed program.

(D) Indicate in its application that its proposed program has the capacity to enroll eligible children into the program or that the program has the ability to automatically enroll eligible children.

(2) (A) The commission shall give grant priority to an applicant meeting the qualifications described in paragraph (1) based upon the following:

(i) Higher percentages of students in the local program’s geographic region who are eligible to receive free or reduced-price meals.

(ii) Lower average and median incomes of families living in the local program’s geographic region.

(iii) Lower college-going rates for students in the local program’s geographic region.

(iv) A higher amount of funding secured, or planned to be secured, through local budget commitments, philanthropy, or other funding sources.

(v) Greater fiscal soundness of the applicant’s long-term plan to sustain its local program.

(vi) A higher number of children who would have access to a college savings account under the local program.

(vii) The extent to which the applicant has a more detailed and effective plan to inform local families about the importance of establishing a college savings account, provide local families with college savings fiscal literacy assistance, and establish a college-going
 culture.

(B) The commission shall give grant priority to an applicant meeting the qualifications described in paragraph (1) that has a plan to invest a minimum of one hundred dollars ($100), through a combination of initial deposits and incentive payments, into each college savings account opened under the local program.

(d) (1) A qualifying entity seeking a grant pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall meet all of the following requirements to receive the grant:

(A) Have a local child savings account program in operation or under development that primarily targets children who are 0 to 10 years of age, inclusive.

(B) Have moneys, in addition to grants received under this chapter, to support its
 program.

(C) Indicate in its application that its program has the capacity to enroll eligible children into the program or that the program has the ability to automatically enroll eligible children.

(2) (A) The commission shall give grant priority to an entity meeting the qualifications of paragraph (1) based upon the following:

(i) Higher percentages of students in the local program’s geographic region who are eligible to receive free or reduced-price meals.

(ii) Lower average and median incomes of families living in the local program’s geographic region.

(iii) Lower college-going rates for students in the local program’s geographic region.

(iv) A higher amount of funding secured through local budget commitments, philanthropy, or other funding sources.

(v) A higher total amount of funds saved for the local program.

(vi) A higher number of outreach events demonstrated by the applicant in its application to cultivate a college-going culture and encourage contributions to child savings accounts.

(vii) Demonstrated ability to sustain and potentially expand its program.

(B) The commission shall give grant priority to an applicant meeting the qualifications described in paragraph (1) that has a plan to invest a minimum of one hundred dollars ($100), through a combination of initial deposits and incentive payments, into each child
 savings account opened under the local program.

(e) The commission shall adopt, as necessary, application procedures, forms, administrative guidelines, and other requirements for purposes of implementing and administering the Child Savings Account Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 18.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

70115.2.

(a) The commission shall use the majority of the 2 percent allocated for purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 70115.1 to provide outreach to potential grantees, to review, score, and select grantees, and to oversee and evaluate grant implementation. The commission shall give outreach priority to underrepresented regions of the state that are not already offering a local child savings account program.

(b) The commission shall provide technical assistance to applicants that includes, but is not necessarily limited to, developing a toolkit for qualifying entities seeking to successfully launch a new local child savings account program, establishing a working group of grantees to share best practices, and assisting qualifying
 entities that are not offering a local child savings account program in developing an application to receive a grant.

(c) The commission shall encourage potential applicants to use the technical assistance made available by the commission to develop their program plans.

(d) (1) The Child Savings Account Grant Program Council is hereby established to advise the commission and grantees on topics that include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) The development of systems and infrastructure to facilitate the successful implementation and operation of local child savings account programs.

(B) Outreach and coordination with local child savings account programs.

(C) Incentives to assist in the development of sustainable and expandable local child savings account programs.

(D) Strategies to minimize grantees’ administrative fees and to cap administrative costs to better ensure that local child savings account programs are of low or no cost to participants.

(E) Contribution strategies, including recordkeeping and cash deposit strategies.

(F) The development of strategies to address local child savings account program accessibility issues, such as language barriers, identification of eligible students, and banking access.

(2) The Child Savings Account Grant Program Council may include representatives of the Governor’s office, the commission, successful
 local child savings account programs, experts in relevant fields such as taxation, savings, and outreach, and interested researchers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 18.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 7. COMMUNITY COLLEGES [70900. - 88933.]



  PART 43. THE CALIFORNIA COMMUNITY COLLEGES [70900. - 70902.]

70900.

There is hereby created the California Community Colleges, a postsecondary education system consisting of community college districts heretofore and hereafter established pursuant to law and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges. The board of governors shall carry out the functions specified in Section 70901, local districts shall carry out the functions specified in Section 70902, and the California Online Community College shall carry out the functions specified in Section 75003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 15.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

70900.5.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Walter Stiern Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1587, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

70901.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall provide leadership and direction in the continuing development of the California Community Colleges as an integral and effective element in the structure of public higher education in the state. The work of the board of governors shall at all times be directed to maintaining and continuing, to the maximum degree permissible, local authority and control in the administration of the California Community Colleges.

(b) Subject to, and in furtherance of, subdivision (a), and in consultation with community college districts and other interested parties as specified in subdivision (e), the board of governors shall provide general supervision over community college districts, and shall, in furtherance of
 those purposes, perform the following functions:

(1) Establish minimum standards as required by law, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Minimum standards to govern student academic standards relating to graduation requirements and probation, dismissal, and readmission policies.

(B) Minimum standards for the employment of academic and administrative staff in community colleges.

(C) Minimum standards for the formation of community colleges and districts.

(D) Minimum standards for credit and noncredit classes.

(E) Minimum standards governing procedures established by governing boards of community college districts
 to ensure faculty, staff, and students the right to participate effectively in district and college governance, and the opportunity to express their opinions at the campus level and to ensure that these opinions are given every reasonable consideration, and the right of academic senates to assume primary responsibility for making recommendations in the areas of curriculum and academic standards.

(2) Evaluate and issue annual reports on the fiscal and educational effectiveness of community college districts according to outcome measures cooperatively developed with those districts, and provide assistance when districts encounter severe management difficulties.

(3) Conduct necessary systemwide research on community colleges, and provide appropriate information services, including, but not limited to, definitions for the purpose of uniform reporting, collection, compilation, and
 analysis of data for effective planning and coordination, and dissemination of information.

(4) (A) Provide representation, advocacy, and accountability for the California Community Colleges before state and national legislative and executive agencies.

(B) In order to wholly engage in the recognition review process of an accrediting agency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 72208, conduct a survey of the community colleges, including consultation with representatives of both faculty and classified personnel, to develop a report to be transmitted to the United States Department of Education and the National Advisory Committee on Institutional Quality and Integrity that reflects a systemwide evaluation of the regional accrediting agency based on the criteria used to determine an accreditor’s status.

(5) (A) Administer state support programs, both operational and capital outlay, and those federally supported programs for which the board of governors has responsibility pursuant to state or federal law. In so doing, the board of governors shall do the following:

(i) (I) Annually prepare and adopt a proposed budget for the California Community Colleges. The proposed budget shall, at a minimum, identify the total revenue needs for serving educational needs within the mission, the amount to be expended for the state general apportionment, the amounts requested for various categorical programs established by law, the amounts requested for new programs and budget improvements, and the amount requested for systemwide administration.

(II) The proposed budget for the California Community Colleges shall be submitted to the
 Department of Finance in accordance with established timelines for development of the annual Budget Bill.

(ii) To the extent authorized by law, establish the method for determining and allocating the state general apportionment.

(iii) Establish space and utilization standards for facility planning in order to determine eligibility for state funds for construction purposes.

(B) The board of governors may enter into a direct contract with the Academic Senate for the California Community Colleges for the purpose of supporting statewide initiatives, projects, and programs within the purview of the Academic Senate for the California Community Colleges. If the board of governors elects to enter into a direct contract with the Academic Senate for the California Community Colleges, the contract shall specify the objectives
 and the expected outcomes of the contract.
